Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.300

Underwriting commissions.

Underwriting commissions shall not exceed an amount or percentage per share acceptable to the director. No underwriting commission may be allowed or paid with respect to shares of capital stock sold in the subscription offering; however, an underwriter may be reimbursed for accountable expenses in connection with the subscription offering where the public offering is so small that reasonable underwriting commissions thereon would not be sufficient to cover total accountable expenses. The term "underwriting commissions" includes underwriting discounts.

[ 1994 c 92 s 378; 1981 c 85 s 59.]